Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.029

Resignation of trustee.

Any trustee may resign, without judicial proceedings, by a writing signed by the trustee and filed with the trust records, to be effective upon the trustee's discharge as provided in RCW 11.98.041.

[ 1989 c 10 s 3. Prior: 1985 c 30 s 43; prior: 1959 c 124 s 4. Formerly RCW 30.99.040.]

NOTES:

Intent—1989 c 10 s 3: "It is the intent of the legislature that RCW 11.98.029 be restored to full force and effect." [ 1989 c 10 s 2.]

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.